bg-BG: Форма на релсите на дъската: 50/50; Квадратна; Надолу; Пълна; Твърда; Остра; Мека; Подпъхната; Друго
cs: Tvar hran desky: 50/50; Hranaté; Sklopené dolů; Plné; Tvrdé; Nožové; Měkké; Zahnuté; Jiné
el: Σχήμα περιμετρικού χείλους της σανίδας: 50/50; Τετράγωνο; Καθοδικό; Πλήρες; Σκληρό; Αιχμηρό; Μαλακό; Διπλωμένο; Άλλο
hu: Deszka sínének alakja: 50/50; Szögletes; Lefelé ívelő; Teli; Kemény; Éles; Puha; Behúzott; Egyéb
pt-PT: Forma do rebordo da prancha: 50/50; Quadrado; Para baixo; Total; Duro; Em forma de faca; Macio; Virado para dentro; Outro
es: Forma del canto de la tabla: 50/50; Cuadrado; Hacia abajo; Completo; Duro; Afilado; Suave; Metido; Otro
fr: Profil du rail de la planche: 50/50; Carré; Vers le bas; Plein; Dur; Couteau; Doux; Rentré; Autre
th: รูปทรงรางบอร์ด: 50/50; ทรงกล่อง; หักลง; เต็ม; คม; คมมีด; มน; โค้งเข้า; อื่นๆ
ja: ボードレールShapes: 50/50; ボキシー; ダウン; フル; ハード; ナイフ; ソフト; タックド; その他
nb: Former på brettskinne: 50/50; Firkantet; Ned; Full; Hard; Knivformet; Myk; Inntrukket; Annet
vi: Hình dạng cạnh ván: 50/50; Dạng hộp; Vát xuống; Dày; Góc cạnh; Vát sắc; Bo tròn; Cụp vào; Khác
ro-RO: Forma șinei plăcii: 50/50; Pătrățos; În jos; Plin; Dur; Tip cuțit; Moale; Întors; Altele
zh-CN: 板缘形状: 50/50; 盒形; 向下; 全形; 硬式; 刀形; 软式; 内缩型; 其他
sv: Skenans form på brädan: 50/50; Kantig; Nedåt; Full; Hård; Knivskarp; Mjuk; Indragen; Annan
zh-TW: 板緣形狀: 50/50; 盒形; 下傾; 飽滿; 硬緣; 刀緣; 軟緣; 內收; 其他
pt-BR: Formato da borda da prancha: 50/50; Quadrado; Para baixo; Cheio; Duro; Afilado; Macio; Recuado; Outros
ru: Форма кантов доски: 50/50; Прямоугольный; Нисходящий; Полный; Жёсткий; Острый; Мягкий; С подворотом; Другое
pl: Kształt raili deski: 50/50; Pudełkowy; Zagięty w dół; Pełny; Twardy; Ostro zakończony; Miękki; Podwinięty; Inne
tr: Board ray şekli: 50/50; Köşeli; Aşağı; Tam; Sert; Keskin; Yumuşak; Kıvrık; Diğer
nl: Board rail vorm: 50/50; Hoekig; Omlaag; Volledig; Hard; Scherp; Zacht; Tucked; Overige
en: Board rail shape: 50/50; Boxy; Down; Full; Hard; Knifed; Soft; Tucked; Other
fi: Laudan kantin muoto: 50/50; Laatikkomainen; Alas; Täysi; Kova; Veitsimäinen; Pehmeä; Taitettu; Muu
sl-SI: Oblika roba deske: 50/50; Kvadratna; Obrnjena navzdol; Polna; Ostra; Ostra kot nož; Mehka; Spodvihana; Drugo
sk-SK: Tvar koľajnice dosky: 50/50; Hranaté; Znížené; Plné; Tvrdé; Ostré; Mäkké; Zastrčené; Iné
ko: 보드 레일 형태: 50/50; 박시형; 다운형; 풀형; 하드형; 나이프형; 소프트형; 턱트형; 기타
da: Form på brætkant: 50/50; Kasseformet; Ned; Fuld; Hård; Knivformet; Blød; Tucked; Andet
hr-HR: Oblik šina za ploču: 50/50; Kutijasti; Spušteni; Puni; Tvrdi; Oštri; Meki; Podvijeni; Ostalo
de: Form der Boardkante: 50/50; Boxy; Down; Full; Hart; Knifed; Weich; Tucked; Sonstige
it: Shapes delle rotaie: 50/50; Squadrato; Inclinato; Pieno; Rigido; Affilato; Morbido; Smussato; Altro
lt-LT: Lentos krašto forma: 50/50; Kvadratinė; Nuleista; Pilna; Kieta; Aštri; Minkšta; Užlenkta; Kita